src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_AEZAE-PL
                      NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
                      NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

! +PxSg1+Pl+Nom:эмвлӓ K                                ;
! +PxSg1+Pl+Nom:мвлӓ  K                                ;
! +Pl+PxSg1+Nom:влӓэм K                                ;
! +PxSg2+Pl+Nom:етвлӓ K                                ;
! +PxSg2+Pl+Nom:твлӓ  K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2:влӓэт K                                ;

LEXICON NMN_PECHEN1E !!= @CODE@  печенье:печенье
!! Front harmony
  NMN_PECHEN1E-SG ;
  NMN_PECHEN1E-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_PECHEN1E-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                               ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_PECHEN1E-PL
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
  NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

LEXICON N_AEVAE !!= @CODE@  ӓвӓ:ӓвӓ
                           +N:%{front%}                    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT  ;
                           +N:%{front%}             NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
                           +N:%{front%}%^KIN               NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT    ; !!!!
                           +N:%{front%}%^KIN               NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

                    +N+Sg+Nom:%{front%}                    K                                ;
              +N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom:%{front%}%>эм                  K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom:%{front%}%>м                   K                                ; !! Special
              +N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom:%{front%}%>эмвлӓ               K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom:%{front%}%>мвлӓ                K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom:влӓэм               K                                ;
              +N+PxSg2+Sg+Nom:%{front%}%>ет                  K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+N+PxSg2+Sg+Nom:%{front%}%>т                   K                                ; !! Special
              +N+PxSg2+Pl+Nom:%{front%}%>етвлӓ               K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+N+PxSg2+Pl+Nom:твлӓ                K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:влӓэт               K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3:%>эш%{ыӹØ%}ж%{ыӹØ%} K                                ;

!!

LEXICON PL-ABEACCCOMDATGENILLINELATNOM_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Abe:влӓде    K ;
  +Pl+Acc:%>влӓм   K ;
  +Pl+Com:%>влӓге  K ;
 +Pl+Cmpr:%>влӓлӓ  K ;
  +Pl+Dat:%>влӓлӓн K ;
  +Pl+Gen:%>влӓн   K ;
  +Pl+Ill:%>влӓшкӹ K ;
  +Pl+Ill:%>влӓш   K ;
  +Pl+Ine:%>влӓштӹ K ;
  +Pl+Lat:%>влӓэш  K ;
  +Pl+Nom:%>влӓ    K ;

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG        ; !!!!!!
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG
  +Sg+Gen:%>%{ыӹØ%}н    K ; !
  +Sg+Acc:%>%{ыӹØ%}м    K ; !
  +Sg+Com:%>ге          K ; ! (with a village)
  +Sg+Dat:%>л%{аӓ%}н    K ; !
  +Sg+Ine:%>%{ыӹØ%}штЫ2 K ; ! (in a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>%{ыӹØ%}шкЫ2 K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>%{ыӹØ%}ш    K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Lat:%>еш          K ; ! (into a village)
 +Sg+Cmpr:%>л%{аӓ%}     K ; ! (like a village)
  +Sg+Abe:%>де          K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK
  +Sg+Gen:%>ын   K ; !
  +Sg+Acc:%>ым   K ; !
  +Sg+Com:%>ге   K ; ! (with a village)
  +Sg+Dat:%>лан  K ; !
  +Sg+Ine:%>ышты K ; ! (in a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>ышкы K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>ыш   K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Lat:%>еш   K ; ! (into a village)
 +Sg+Cmpr:%>ла   K ; ! (like a village)
  +Sg+Abe:%>де   K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT
  +Sg+Gen:%>ӹн   K ; !
  +Sg+Acc:%>ӹм   K ; !
  +Sg+Com:%>ге   K ; ! (with a village)
  +Sg+Dat:%>лӓн  K ; !
  +Sg+Ine:%>ӹштӹ K ; ! (in a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>ӹшкӹ K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>ӹш   K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Lat:%>еш   K ; ! (into a village)
 +Sg+Cmpr:%>лӓ   K ; ! (like a village)
  +Sg+Abe:%>де   K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL
!!
  +Pl+Nom:%>влӓ    K ;
  +Pl+Gen:%>влӓн   K ; !
  +Pl+Acc:%>влӓм   K ; !
  +Pl+Com:%>влӓге  K ; ! (with a village)
  +Pl+Dat:%>влӓлӓн K ; !
  +Pl+Ine:%>влӓштӹ K ; ! (in a village)
  +Pl+Ill:%>влӓшкӹ K ; ! (to a village)
  +Pl+Ill:%>влӓш   K ; ! (to a village)
  +Pl+Lat:%>влӓэш  K ; ! (into a village)
 +Pl+Cmpr:%>влӓлӓ  K ; ! (like a village)
  +Pl+Abe:%>влӓде  K ; ! (without a village)



LEXICON N_01
  +Sg+Gen:%>%{ыӹØ%}н            K ; !
  +Sg+Acc:%>%{ыӹØ%}м            K ; !
  +Sg+Com:%>ге                  K ; ! (with a village)
  +Sg+Dat:%>л%{аӓ%}н            K ; !
  +Sg+Ine:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}    K ; ! (in a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>%{ыӹØ%}шк%{ыӹØ%}    K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>%{ыӹØ%}ш            K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Lat:%>еш                  K ; ! (into a village)
 +Sg+Cmpr:%>л%{аӓ%}             K ; ! (like a village)
  +Sg+Abe:%>де                  K ; ! (without a village)
!!
  +Pl+Nom:влӓ                   K ;
  +Pl+Gen:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}н         K ; !
  +Pl+Acc:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}м         K ; !
  +Pl+Com:влӓ%>ге               K ; ! (with a village)
  +Pl+Dat:влӓ%>л%{аӓ%}н         K ; !
  +Pl+Ine:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%} K ; ! (in a village)
  +Pl+Ill:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}шк%{ыӹØ%} K ; ! (to a village)
  +Pl+Ill:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}ш         K ; ! (to a village)
  +Pl+Lat:влӓ%>Е2ш              K ; ! (into a village)
 +Pl+Cmpr:влӓ%>л%{аӓ%}          K ; ! (like a village)
  +Pl+Abe:влӓ%>де               K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK
!! PxSg1+NB+CASE
!! singular possessa
!!

!!
!     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: [колем, колэм] # х2 колэмжӹ

!!PxSg1
  SG-ABE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-COM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG1_MUTUAL ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG1_BACK   ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG1_BACK    ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-INE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG1_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXSG1_BACK    ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
!!PxSg2
  SG-ABE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-COM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG2_MUTUAL ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG2_BACK   ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-INE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG2_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXSG2_BACK    ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
!!PxSg3
  SG-ABE-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-COM-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG3_BACK   ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG3_BACK    ;
!!PxPl1
  PXPL1-SG-ABE         ;
  PXPL1-SG-ACC         ;
  PXPL1-SG-COM         ;
  PXPL1-SG-CMPR        ;
  PXPL1-SG-DAT         ;
  PXPL1-SG-GEN         ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL1_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXPL1_BACK    ;
  PXPL1-SG-LAT         ;
  PXPL1-SG-NOM         ;
!!PxPl2
  PXPL2-SG-ABE         ;
  PXPL2-SG-ACC         ;
  PXPL2-SG-COM         ;
  PXPL2-SG-CMPR        ;
  PXPL2-SG-DAT         ;
  PXPL2-SG-GEN         ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL2_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXPL2_BACK    ;
  PXPL2-SG-LAT         ;
  SG-NOM-PXPL2         ;
!!PxPl3
  SG-ABE-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-ACC-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-COM-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-CMPR-PXPL3_BACK   ;
  SG-DAT-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-GEN-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-LAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXPL3_BACK    ;
